Illinois, session 104th, HB3428.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Assisted Living and Shared Housing Act is 5amended by adding Section 111 as follows: 6    (210 ILCS 9/111 new)7    Sec. 111. Joint provider, surveyor, and association 8trainings. The Department shall semiannually provide joint 9training sessions for surveyors and assisted living 10establishment providers. The Department shall include the 11State long-term care ombudsman, or the State long-term care 12ombudsman's designee, and representatives of each assisted 13living provider association in the State in the planning 14process to create the topics and content of the joint training 15sessions as well as the coordination and presentations for the 16joint training sessions. At least annually, a joint training 17session shall include, but not be limited to, regional 18citation patterns relating to complaints, standards, and 19outcomes in the assisted living survey process. The Department 20shall also develop standardized training for establishments to 21prevent common citations in the assisted living survey 22process.   HB3428 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 10466 BAB 20541 b1    Section 10. The Nursing Home Care Act is amended by adding 2Section 3-811 as follows: 3    (210 ILCS 45/3-811 new)4    Sec. 3-811. Joint provider, surveyor, and association 5trainings. The Department shall semiannually provide joint 6training sessions for surveyors and nursing home providers. 7The Department shall include the State long-term care 8ombudsman, or the State long-term care ombudsman's designee, 9and representatives of each nursing home provider association 10in the State in the planning process to create the topics and 11content of the joint training sessions as well as the 12coordination and presentations for the joint training 13sessions. At least annually, a joint training session shall 14include, but not be limited to, regional citation patterns 15relating to complaints, standards, and outcomes in the nursing 16home survey process.